Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2809
Property; unpaid taxes; sale; proceeds insufficient; special assessments, interest, penalty; cancel.

If after the proceeds have been distributed and there still remains unpaid any portion of special assessments, interest, penalties, or costs thereon the governing body of each and every political subdivision interested in the unpaid special assessment shall cause such special assessment, and interest, penalties and costs thereon to be stricken from the records. Such action shall forever release such property from such special assessments and interest, penalties and costs thereon.

Laws 1967, c. 483, § 9, p. 1497.